Hawaii statutes.
§195F-2 Definitions. As used in
this chapter:

"Board" means the board of land and
natural resources.

"Department" means the department of
land and natural resources.

"Fund" means the forest stewardship
fund as established by section 195F-4.

"Landowner" means any person having
an interest in or holding any encumbrance upon land in the State, including any
person having a lease interest in the real property with an unexpired term of
ten or more years.

"Native vegetation" means a diverse
vegetation consisting mostly of plants endemic or indigenous to Hawaii.

"Potential natural area reserve"
means land or water areas within the protective subzone of the conservation
district established pursuant to chapter 183C, intact native natural
communities identified by the heritage program under chapter 195, and other
lands or waters meeting criteria established by the natural area reserves
system commission.

"Program" means the forest
stewardship program established in section 195F-3. [L 1991, c 327, pt of §2; am
L 1995, c 11, §9 and c 69, §7]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next